Maryland, session 2025, SB0742.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
23–103.
(a) (1) On receipt of an application and a nonrefundable fee established by the
Administration from a facility for an inspection station license, the Division shall:
(i) Inspect the facility as to its ability to inspect and correct
equipment; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0742*

SENATE BILL 742
(ii) If the facility is qualified, issue to it a license as an inspection
station.
(2) On receipt of a renewal application and the annual license fee
established by the Administration for an inspection station, the Division shall issue the
renewal license if the facility is qualified.
(b) The license authorizes the facility to:
(1) Inspect a used vehicle on request of its transferor or transferee;
(2) Inspect the equipment of a vehicle for which a safety equipment repair
order has been issued and issue a repair order certification for the vehicle; [and]
(3) Inspect an ambulance on the request of its owner that is required to be
inspected under § 13–515 of the Education Article; AND
(4) INSPECT A VEHICLE AND ISSUE AN INSPECTION CERTIFICATE
UNDER § 23–107.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(c) The Division may:
(1) For cause, suspend or revoke an inspection station license; and
(2) On suspension or revocation of the license, require the surrender of the
license and all related material issued by the Division.
(d) The Division may establish standards by rule or regulation for the licensing
and operation of inspection stations.
(e) The Administration may not set a fee under this section that exceeds the
administrative cost of the Division under this program.
23–107.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “INSPECTION CERTIFICATE” MEANS A CERTIFICATION
BY AN AUTHORIZED INSPECTION STATION THAT A MOTOR VEHICLE MEETS OR
EXCEEDS THE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS TITLE FOR THE EQUIPMENT
SUBJECT TO INSPECTION.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) CLASS L (HISTORIC) VEHICLES; OR

SENATE BILL 742 3
(2) ANY VEHICLE SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBTITLE 3
OF THIS TITLE.
(C) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL REQUIRE THE BIENNIAL SUBMISSION OF
AN INSPECTION CERTIFICATE FOR ANY MOTOR VEHICLE REQUIRED TO BE
REGISTERED UNDER TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE THAT IS AT LEAST 6 MODEL YEARS
OLD.
(D) AN INSPECTION REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE AN
EXAMINATION OF THE FOLLOWING EQUIPMENT TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE
EQUIPMENT MEETS OR EXCEEDS THE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS TITLE:
(1) BRAKES;
(2) STEERING COLUMN;
(3) HORN;
(4) MIRRORS;
(5) LIGHTS;
(6) WINDOWS;
(7) WINDSHIELD;
(8) WINDSHIELD WIPERS;
(9) SPEEDOMETER; AND
(10) SEAT BELTS.
(E) AN INSPECTION CERTIFICATE SHALL:
(1) REMAIN VALID FOR 90 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE CERTIFICATE
IS ISSUED; AND
(2) IDENTIFY:
(I) THE INSPECTION STATION WHERE THE MOTOR VEHICLE
WAS INSPECTED; AND
(II) THE LICENSED INSPECTION MECHANIC WHO INSPECTED

SENATE BILL 742
THE MOTOR VEHICLE.
(F) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
(2) THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
ESTABLISH THE MAXIMUM FEE THAT AN INSPECTION STATION MAY CHARGE FOR
CONDUCTING AN INSPECTION, A SPECIFIC PORTION OF WHICH SHALL BE PAID TO OR
RETAINED BY THE ADMINISTRATION TO COVER THE COSTS OF ADMINISTRATION
AND ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.